Maine, session 132, LD803.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 20-A MRSA §13003-A is enacted to read:
§13003-A. Certification violations
The department and school administrative units shall address violations of certification
requirements in this chapter and in chapter 502 in accordance with this section.
1. Notification to superintendent. Within 30 days of learning of a certification
violation, the department shall notify the superintendent of the school administrative unit
that employs the teacher or educational personnel in violation of the certification
requirements.
2. Action plan. Within 30 days of receiving a notification of a violation under
subsection 1, the superintendent shall develop and notify the department of an action plan
to resolve the certification violation. Every 30 days thereafter until the certification
violation has been resolved, the superintendent shall update the department in writing on
the status of the certification violation and the implementation of the action plan.
3. Notice to school board. If the superintendent fails to provide the department with
an action plan within 30 days of receiving notification of a certification violation or fails to
provide written updates to the department pursuant to subsection 2, the department shall
notify the school board of the school administrative unit. The school board shall develop
and notify the department of an action plan to address the certification violation.
4. Monitoring. The department shall monitor school administrative units for
compliance with teacher and educational personnel certification requirements in this
chapter and chapter 502.
5. Penalty. If a superintendent or school board fails to comply with the requirements
in subsections 2 and 3, the commissioner may deduct up to $1,000 per day from a school
administrative unit's state subsidy until the certification violations are resolved or the
school administrative unit is in compliance with the requirements in subsections 2 and 3.